Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 9 Forestry Functions of Department of Environmental Management

2-9-1, 2-9-2.
[Obsolete.]

2-9-3.
Leases and concessions on reservations.

The department of environmental management may let, rent or lease any parts of the reservations under its control or any building on the reservation and may grant any concessions on or about those reservations, as in the opinion of the director of environmental
management may seem necessary or advisable, but not for periods in excess of five (5) years.

History of Section. P.L. 1919, ch. 1742, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-9-3

.

2-9-4.
Employees — Records — Annual report.

The director of environmental management shall determine the duties of all employees, remove them in the manner provided by chapter 4 of title 36, and make all reasonable rules and regulations concerning them. The maps, plans, documents, records, books,
papers, and accounts of the department are subject to public inspection at any times that the director may determine. The director shall make an annual report to the general assembly together with a full statement of the receipts and
disbursements of the department.

History of Section. P.L. 1907, ch. 1466, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 238, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1357, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

2-9-4

.

2-9-5.
Appropriations — Expenses.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary for the purposes of this chapter; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums
appropriated, or sums that may from time to time be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1919, ch. 1742, § 4; P.L. 1920, ch. 1837, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 279, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 824, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1357, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 220, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L.
1952, ch. 2973, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-9-5

.

2-9-6.
Publication of information.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management to obtain and publish information concerning the extent and condition of the forest lands in the state and the means of protecting the forests from fire and other depredation, and to diffuse as
widely as possible, by public addresses and personal communication, a knowledge of practical forestry and methods of replanting deforested areas.

History of Section. P.L. 1906, ch. 1322, § 2; G. L. 1909, ch. 239, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 280, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 223, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-9-6

.

2-9-7, 2-9-8.
[Obsolete.]